vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX yU Y 40
SFX yU uire uire/ uire
SFX yU uire uisant/ uire
SFX yU uire ui/ uire
SFX yU uire uis/ uire
SFX yU uire uit/ uire
SFX yU uire uisons/ uire
SFX yU uire uisez/ uire
SFX yU uire uisent/ uire
SFX yU uire uisais/ uire
SFX yU uire uisait/ uire
SFX yU uire uisions/ uire
SFX yU uire uisiez/ uire
SFX yU uire uisaient/ uire
SFX yU uire uisis/ uire
SFX yU uire uisit/ uire
SFX yU uire uisîmes/ uire
SFX yU uire uisîtes/ uire
SFX yU uire uisirent/ uire
SFX yU uire uirai/ uire
SFX yU uire uiras/ uire
SFX yU uire uira/ uire
SFX yU uire uirons/ uire
SFX yU uire uirez/ uire
SFX yU uire uiront/ uire
SFX yU uire uirais/ uire
SFX yU uire uirait/ uire
SFX yU uire uirions/ uire
SFX yU uire uiriez/ uire
SFX yU uire uiraient/ uire
SFX yU uire uise/ uire
SFX yU uire uises/ uire
SFX yU uire uisisse/ uire
SFX yU uire uisisses/ uire
SFX yU uire uisît/ uire
SFX yU uire uisissions/ uire
SFX yU uire uisissiez/ uire
SFX yU uire uisissent/ uire
SFX yU uire uis/ uire
SFX yU uire uisons/ uire
SFX yU uire uisez/ uire

SFX yV Y 45
SFX yV ire ire/ ire
SFX yV ire isant/ ire
SFX yV ire it/ nfire
SFX yV ire its/ nfire
SFX yV ire ite/ nfire
SFX yV ire ites/ nfire
SFX yV ire is/ cire
SFX yV ire ise/ cire
SFX yV ire ises/ cire
SFX yV ire i/ ffire
SFX yV ire is/ ire
SFX yV ire it/ ire
SFX yV ire isons/ ire
SFX yV ire isez/ ire
SFX yV ire isent/ ire
SFX yV ire isais/ ire
SFX yV ire isait/ ire
SFX yV ire isions/ ire
SFX yV ire isiez/ ire
SFX yV ire isaient/ ire
SFX yV ire îmes/ ire
SFX yV ire îtes/ ire
SFX yV ire irent/ ire
SFX yV ire irai/ ire
SFX yV ire iras/ ire
SFX yV ire ira/ ire
SFX yV ire irons/ ire
SFX yV ire irez/ ire
SFX yV ire iront/ ire
SFX yV ire irais/ ire
SFX yV ire irait/ ire
SFX yV ire irions/ ire
SFX yV ire iriez/ ire
SFX yV ire iraient/ ire
SFX yV ire ise/ ire
SFX yV ire ises/ ire
SFX yV ire isse/ ire
SFX yV ire isses/ ire
SFX yV ire ît/ ire
SFX yV ire issions/ ire
SFX yV ire issiez/ ire
SFX yV ire issent/ ire
SFX yV ire is/ ire
SFX yV ire isons/ ire
SFX yV ire isez/ ire

SFX yW Y 38
SFX yW ire ire/ rire
SFX yW ire iant/ rire
SFX yW ire i/ rire
SFX yW ire is/ rire
SFX yW ire it/ rire
SFX yW ire ions/ rire
SFX yW ire iez/ rire
SFX yW ire ient/ rire
SFX yW ire iais/ rire
SFX yW ire iait/ rire
SFX yW ire iions/ rire
SFX yW ire iiez/ rire
SFX yW ire iaient/ rire
SFX yW ire îmes/ rire
SFX yW ire îtes/ rire
SFX yW ire irent/ rire
SFX yW ire irai/ rire
SFX yW ire iras/ rire
SFX yW ire ira/ rire
SFX yW ire irons/ rire
SFX yW ire irez/ rire
SFX yW ire iront/ rire
SFX yW ire irais/ rire
SFX yW ire irait/ rire
SFX yW ire irions/ rire
SFX yW ire iriez/ rire
SFX yW ire iraient/ rire
SFX yW ire ie/ rire
SFX yW ire ies/ rire
SFX yW ire isse/ rire
SFX yW ire isses/ rire
SFX yW ire ît/ rire
SFX yW ire issions/ rire
SFX yW ire issiez/ rire
SFX yW ire issent/ rire
SFX yW ire is/ rire
SFX yW ire ions/ rire
SFX yW ire iez/ rire

SFX yX Y 30
SFX yX nuire nuire/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisant/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nui/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuit/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisent/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisait/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisions/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisiez/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisit/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîmes/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîtes/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuira/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirons/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirez/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiront/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirait/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirions/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiriez/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuise/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisît/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissions/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons-nous/ nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez-vous/ nuire

SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/ occire
SFX yY ccire ccis/ occire
SFX yY ccire ccise/ occire
SFX yY ccire ccises/ occire

SFX yZ Y 14
SFX yZ rire rire/ rire
SFX yZ rire risant/ rire
SFX yZ rire rit/ rire
SFX yZ rire rits/ rire
SFX yZ rire rite/ rire
SFX yZ rire rites/ rire
SFX yZ rire ris/ rire
SFX yZ rire rit/ rire
SFX yZ rire rirai/ rire
SFX yZ rire riras/ rire
SFX yZ rire rira/ rire
SFX yZ rire rirais/ rire
SFX yZ rire rirait/ rire
SFX yZ rire ris/ rire

SFX q+ Y 36
SFX q+ enir enu/ enir
SFX q+ enir enus/ enir
SFX q+ enir enue/ enir
SFX q+ enir enues/ enir
SFX q+ tir ti/ tir
SFX q+ tir tis/ tir
SFX q+ tir tie/ tir
SFX q+ tir ties/ tir
SFX q+ courir couru/ courir
SFX q+ courir courus/ courir
SFX q+ courir courue/ courir
SFX q+ courir courues/ courir
SFX q+ ivre écu/ vivre
SFX q+ ivre écus/ vivre
SFX q+ ivre écue/ vivre
SFX q+ ivre écues/ vivre
SFX q+ aire u/ aire
SFX q+ aire us/ aire
SFX q+ aire ue/ aire
SFX q+ aire ues/ aire
SFX q+ dre du/ dre
SFX q+ dre dus/ dre
SFX q+ dre due/ dre
SFX q+ dre dues/ dre
SFX q+ valoir valu/ .valoir
SFX q+ valoir valus/ .valoir
SFX q+ valoir value/ .valoir
SFX q+ valoir values/ .valoir
SFX q+ aître u/ aître
SFX q+ aître us/ aître
SFX q+ aître ue/ aître
SFX q+ aître ues/ aître
SFX q+ aitre u/ aitre
SFX q+ aitre us/ aitre
SFX q+ aitre ue/ aitre
SFX q+ aitre ues/ aitre

SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/ enir
SFX q. tir ti/ tir
SFX q. courir couru/ courir
SFX q. ivre écu/ vivre
SFX q. aire u/ aire
SFX q. dre du/ dre
SFX q. valoir valu/ .valoir
SFX q. aître u/ aître
SFX q. aitre u/ aitre
