vim/st.dic
apparaitre/wQq+
apparaître/wQq+
circoncire/yV
comparaitre/wQq.
comparaître/wQq.
confire/yV
connaitre/wQq+
connaître/wQq+
déconfire/yV
disparaitre/wQq+
disparaître/wQq+
entrenuire/yX
frire/yZ
luire/yU
méconnaitre/wQq+
méconnaître/wQq+
nuire/yU
occire/yY
paraitre/wQq+
paraître/wQq+
réapparaitre/wQq+
réapparaître/wQq+
recomparaitre/wQq.
recomparaître/wQq.
reconnaitre/wQq+
reconnaître/wQq+
reluire/yU
reparaitre/wQq+
reparaître/wQq+
rire/yW
sourire/yW
suffire/yV
transparaitre/wQq.
transparaître/wQq.
